Washington statutes.
RCW 22.32.040

Issuance of second receipt not marked "duplicate."

Every person mentioned in RCW 22.32.020, who shall issue any second or duplicate receipt or voucher of the kind specified in said section, while a former receipt or voucher for the goods, wares or merchandise specified in such second receipt is outstanding and uncanceled, without writing across the face of the same the word "Duplicate," in a plain and legible manner, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 394; RRS s 2646.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Caption for 1909 c 249 s 394 reads as follows: "SEC. 394. DUPLICATE RECEIPT."